Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-188.1 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The State Department of Education shall develop a system to code
initial teacher certification in order to report data on the
pathways for initial teacher certification, including emergency
certification and full-time adjunct certification.
Req. No. 11714 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-188.2 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created the Data Governance Council.
B. The Council shall:
1. Monitor and evaluate the impact of each teacher
certification pathway, including emergency certification and full-
time adjunct certification, as reported by the State Department of
Education pursuant to Section 1 of this act, on education outcomes
in the state;
2. Identify essential data elements indicative of teacher
workforce quality and ensure these elements are appropriately
defined and standardized for acceptable uses across certification
pathways; and
3. Establish best practices in data management and storage
processes to ensure security, privacy, and appropriate integration.
C. The Council shall be comprised of thirteen (13) members as
follows:
1. The Chancellor of the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, or designee;
2. The State Superintendent of Public Instruction, or designee;
3. The Executive Director of the Office of Educational Quality
and Accountability, or designee;

Req. No. 11714 Page 2

4. One member who is an employee of the State Department of
Education, designated by the State Superintendent of Public
Instruction;
5. One member who is part of an organization or association
representing school district boards of education in the state,
appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives;
6. One member who is part of an organization or association
representing school administrators in the state, appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate;
7. One member who is an elementary or secondary public school
teacher in the state, appointed by the Governor;
8. One member who is a principal from a public prekindergarten
through twelfth-grade school, appointed by the Speaker of the
Oklahoma House of Representatives; and
9. Five members representing deans, directors, or coordinators
from accredited, university-based educator preparation programs in
the state, appointed as follows:
a. two members appointed by the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives,
b. two members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of
the Oklahoma State Senate, and
c. one member appointed by the Governor.
D. Appointments to the Council shall be made by no later than
December 1, 2025. The first meeting of the Council shall be called
Req. No. 11714 Page 3

by t he State Superintendent of Public Instruction no later than
February 1, 2026. At the first meeting, the members of the Council
shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among the members. Meetings
of the Council shall be held at least quarterly at the call of the
chair. Members shall serve at the pleasure of their appointing
authorities. A majority of the members of the Council shall
constitute a quorum to transact business, but no vacancy shall
impair the right of the remaining members to exercise all of the
powers of the Council. A vacancy on the Council shall be filled by
the original appointing authority. The State Department of
Education, Office of Educational Quality and Accountability, and the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall provide staff,
support, and information as requested by the Council.
E. Members of the Council shall receive no compensation for
serving on the Council.
F. The Council shall be subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting
Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
G. Members who serve on the Council shall be exempt from the
dual-office-holding prohibitions of Section 6 of Title 51 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11714 AQH 12/09/24

Req. No. 11714 Page 4